test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verb-klasse1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - båetedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -åe-
    båetedh+V+IV+Inf: båetedh
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: båatam
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: båatah
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: båata
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: båetien
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [båeteden, båetiejidien]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: båetiejægan
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [båetebe, båetiejibie]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [båetede, båetiejidie]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: båetieh
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [båetiejim, böötim]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [båetiejih, böötih]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [båetieji, bööti]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [båetiejimen, böötimen]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [båetiejiden, böötiden]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [båetiejigan, böötigan]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [båetiejimh, böötimh]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [båetiejidh, böötidh]
    båetedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [båetiejin, böötin]
    båetedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: båetieh
    båetedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [båeteden, båetiejidien]
    båetedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [båetede, båetiejidie]
    båetedh+V+IV+ConNeg: båetieh
    båetedh+V+IV+Ger: båetieminie
    båetedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: båateme
    båetedh+V+IV+VGen: båetien
        
    
  Verb - iehtsedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -ie-
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Inf: iehtsedh
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eahtsam
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: eahtsah
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eahtsa
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: iehtsien
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [iehtseden, iehtsiejidien]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: iehtsiejægan
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [iehtsebe, iehtsiejibie]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [iehtsede, iehtsiejidie]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: iehtsieh
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [iehtsiejim, eehtsim]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [iehtsiejih, eehtsih]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [iehtsieji, eehtsi]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [iehtsiejimen, eehtsimen]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [iehtsiejiden, eehtsiden]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [iehtsiejigan, eehtsigan]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [iehtsiejimh, eehtsimh]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [iehtsiejidh, eehtsidh]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [iehtsiejin, eehtsin]
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: iehtsieh
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: iehtseden # longform?
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: iehtsede # longform?
    iehtsedh+V+TV+ConNeg: iehtsieh
    iehtsedh+V+TV+Ger: iehtsieminie
    iehtsedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: eahtseme
    iehtsedh+V+TV+VGen: iehtsien   
    
  Verb - baetsedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -ae-
    baetsedh+V+IV+Inf: baetsedh
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: baatsam
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: baatsah
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: baatsa
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: baetsien
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [baetseden, baetsiejidien]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: baetsiejægan
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [baetsebe, baetsiejibie]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [baetsede, baetsiejidie]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: baetsieh
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [baetsiejim, beetsim]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [baetsiejih, beetsih]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [baetsieji, beetsi]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [baetsiejimen, beetsimen]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [baetsiejiden, beetsiden]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [baetsiejigan, beetsigan]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [baetsiejimh, beetsimh]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [baetsiejidh, beetsidh]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [baetsiejin, beetsin]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: baetsieh
    baetsedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [baetseden, baetsiejidien]
    baetsedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [baetsede, baetsiejidie]
    baetsedh+V+IV+ConNeg: baetsieh
    baetsedh+V+IV+Ger: baetsieminie
    baetsedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: baatseme
    baetsedh+V+IV+VGen: baetsien
        
  Verb - guedtedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -ue-
    guedtedh+V+TV+Inf: guedtedh
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: guadtam
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: guadtah
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: guadta
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: guedtien
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [guedteden, guedtiejidien]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: guedtiejægan
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [guedtebe, guedtiejibie]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [guedtede, guedtiejidie]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: guedtieh
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [guedtiejim, göödtim]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [guedtiejih, göödtih]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [guedtieji, göödti]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [guedtiejimen, göödtimen]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [guedtiejiden, göödtiden]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [guedtiejigan, göödtigan]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [guedtiejimh, göödtimh]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [guedtiejidh, göödtidh]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [guedtiejin, göödtin]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: guedtieh
    guedtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [guedteden, guedtiejidien]
    guedtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [guedtede, guedtiejidie]
    guedtedh+V+TV+ConNeg: guedtieh
    guedtedh+V+TV+Ger: guedtieminie
    guedtedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: guadteme
    guedtedh+V+TV+VGen: guedtien 
    
  Verb - vedtedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -e-
    vedtedh+V+TV+Inf: vedtedh
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vadtam
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vadtah
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vadta
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: vedtien
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vedteden, vedtiejidien]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: vedtiejægan
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [vedtebe, vedtiejibie]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vedtede, vedtiejidie]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vedtieh
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [vedtiejim, vedtim] # not with i
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vedtiejih, vedtih]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vedtieji, vedti]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [vedtiejimen, vedtimen]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [vedtiejiden, vedtiden]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vedtiejigan, vedtigan]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vedtiejimh, vedtimh]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vedtiejidh, vedtidh]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vedtiejin, vedtin]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: vedtieh
    vedtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: [vedteden, vedtiejidien]
    vedtedh+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [vedtede, vedtiejidie]
    vedtedh+V+TV+ConNeg: vedtieh
    vedtedh+V+TV+Ger: vedtieminie
    vedtedh+V+TV+PrfPrc: vadteme
    vedtedh+V+TV+VGen: vedtien
        
  Verb - juhtedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -u-
    juhtedh+V+IV+Inf: juhtedh
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jåhtam
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jåhtah
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jåhta
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: juhtien
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [juhteden, juhtiejidien]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: juhtiejægan
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [juhtebe, juhtiejibie]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [juhtede, juhtiejidie]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juhtieh
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [juhtiejim, juhtim] 
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [juhtiejih, juhtih]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [juhtieji, juhti]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [juhtiejimen, juhtimen]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [juhtiejiden, juhtiden]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [juhtiejigan, juhtigan]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [juhtiejimh, juhtimh]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [juhtiejidh, juhtidh]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [juhtiejin, juhtin]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: juhtieh
    juhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [juhteden, juhtiejidien]
    juhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [juhtede, juhtiejidie]
    juhtedh+V+IV+ConNeg: juhtieh
    juhtedh+V+IV+Ger: juhtieminie
    juhtedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: jåhteme
    juhtedh+V+IV+VGen: juhtien
    
    
  Verb - jijhtedh: # verb I, stem -ie, root vowel -i-
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Inf: jijhtedh
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jæjhtam
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: jæjhtah
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jæjhta
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: jijhtien
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: [jijhteden, jijhtiejidien]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: jijhtiejægan
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [jijhtebe, jijhtiejibie]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [jijhtede, jijhtiejidie]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: jijhtieh
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [jijhtiejim, jijhtim] 
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [jijhtiejih, jijhtih]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [jijhtieji, jijhti]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: [jijhtiejimen, jijhtimen]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: [jijhtiejiden, jijhtiden]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du3: [jijhtiejigan, jijhtigan]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [jijhtiejimh, jijhtimh]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [jijhtiejidh, jijhtidh]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [jijhtiejin, jijhtin]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: jijhtieh
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Du2: [jijhteden, jijhtiejidien]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [jijhtede, jijhtiejidie]
    jijhtedh+V+IV+ConNeg: jijhtieh
    jijhtedh+V+IV+Ger: jijhtieminie
    jijhtedh+V+IV+PrfPrc: jæjhteme
    jijhtedh+V+IV+VGen: jijhtien
